incubator/apertium-sme-smj.sme.dix
    <pardef n="Háns/a__N_Prop">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>a<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sain</l>
          <r>a<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ii</l>
          <r>a<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sa</l>
          <r>a<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sa</l>
          <r>a<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sas</l>
          <r>a<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>saiguin</l>
          <r>a<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>saide</l>
          <r>a<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sat</l>
          <r>a<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>said</l>
          <r>a<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>said</l>
          <r>a<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sain</l>
          <r>a<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Stáhp/pu__N_Prop">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pun</l>
          <r>pu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uin</l>
          <r>pu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pui</l>
          <r>pu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pu</l>
          <r>pu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>pu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>pu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>pu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uiguin</l>
          <r>pu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uide</l>
          <r>pu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ut</l>
          <r>pu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uid</l>
          <r>pu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uid</l>
          <r>pu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uin</l>
          <r>pu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Sált/u__N_Prop">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>un</l>
          <r>u<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tuin</l>
          <r>u<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ui</l>
          <r>u<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>u<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tu</l>
          <r>u<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tu</l>
          <r>u<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tus</l>
          <r>u<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tuiguin</l>
          <r>u<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tuide</l>
          <r>u<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tut</l>
          <r>u<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tuid</l>
          <r>u<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tuid</l>
          <r>u<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tuin</l>
          <r>u<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Čo/albmi__N_Prop">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>albmin</l>
          <r>albmi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>almmiin</l>
          <r>albmi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>albmái</l>
          <r>albmi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>albmi</l>
          <r>albmi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>almme</l>
          <r>albmi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>almmi</l>
          <r>albmi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>almmis</l>
          <r>albmi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lmmiiguin</l>
          <r>albmi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lmmiide</l>
          <r>albmi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>almmit</l>
          <r>albmi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lmmiid</l>
          <r>albmi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lmmiid</l>
          <r>albmi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lmmiin</l>
          <r>albmi<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Gálsa"><i>Gáls</i><par n="Háns/a__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Gaska-Romsa"><i>Gaska-Roms</i><par n="Háns/a__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Gaska-Tromsa"><i>Gaska-Troms</i><par n="Háns/a__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Gustu"><i>Gust</i><par n="Sált/u__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Hánsa"><i>Háns</i><par n="Háns/a__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Lulli-Tromsa"><i>Lulli-Troms</i><par n="Háns/a__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Lulli-Romsa"><i>Lulli-Roms</i><par n="Háns/a__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Mátta-Tromsa"><i>Mátta-Troms</i><par n="Háns/a__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Mátta-Romsa"><i>Mátta-Roms</i><par n="Háns/a__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Nuorta-Sáltu"><i>Nuorta-Sált</i><par n="Sált/u__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Oarje-Romsa"><i>Oarje-Roms</i><par n="Háns/a__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Pariisa"><i>Pariis</i><par n="Háns/a__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Peđar-Hánsa"><i>Peđar-Háns</i><par n="Háns/a__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Ráisa"><i>Ráis</i><par n="Háns/a__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Romsa"><i>Roms</i><par n="Háns/a__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Sáltu"><i>Sált</i><par n="Sált/u__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Sámekonferánsa"><i>Sámekonferáns</i><par n="Háns/a__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Stáhppu"><i>Stáhp</i><par n="Stáhp/pu__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Tromsa"><i>Troms</i><par n="Háns/a__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Čoalbmi"><i>Čo</i><par n="Čo/albmi__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Davvi-Romsa"><i>Davvi-Roms</i><par n="Háns/a__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Davvi-Tromsa"><i>Davvi-Troms</i><par n="Háns/a__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Davvi-Sáltu"><i>Davvi-Sált</i><par n="Sált/u__N_Prop"/></e>
